Florida, session 2026, HB6031.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
16
17 Section 1. Paragraphs (a), (d), and (e) of subsection (2)
18 of section 1006.28, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
19 1006.28 Duties of district school board, district school
20 superintendent; and school principal regarding K-12
21 instructional materials.—
22 (2) DISTRICT SCHOOL BOARD.—The district school board has
23 the constitutional duty and responsibility to select and provide
24 adequate instructional materials for all students in accordance
25 with the requirements of this part. The district school board
Page 1 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6031-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6031 2026
26 also has the following specific duties and responsibilities:
27 (a) Courses of study; adoption.—Adopt courses of study,
28 including instructional materials, for use in the schools of the
29 district.
30 1. Each district school board is responsible for the
31 content of all instructional materials and any other materials
32 used in a classroom, made available in a school or classroom
33 library, or included on a reading list, whether adopted and
34 purchased from the state-adopted instructional materials list,
35 adopted and purchased through a district instructional materials
36 program under s. 1006.283, or otherwise purchased or made
37 available.
38 2. Each district school board must adopt a policy
39 regarding an objection by a parent or a resident of the county
40 to the use of a specific material, which clearly describes a
41 process to handle all objections and provides for resolution.
42 The objection form, as prescribed by State Board of Education
43 rule, and the district school board's process must be easy to
44 read and understand and be easily accessible on the homepage of
45 the school district's website. The objection form must also
46 identify the school district point of contact and contact
47 information for the submission of an objection. The process must
48 provide the parent or resident the opportunity to proffer
49 evidence to the district school board that:
50 a. An instructional material does not meet the criteria of
Page 2 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6031-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6031 2026
51 s. 1006.31(2) or s. 1006.40(3)(c) if it was selected for use in
52 a course or otherwise made available to students in the school
53 district but was not subject to the public notice, review,
54 comment, and hearing procedures under s. 1006.283(2)(b)8., 9.,
55 and 11.
56 b. Any material used in a classroom, made available in a
57 school or classroom library, or included on a reading list
58 contains content which:
59 (I) Is pornographic or prohibited under s. 847.012;
60 (II) Depicts or describes sexual conduct as defined in s.
61 847.001(19), unless such material is for a course required by s.
62 1003.46 or s. 1003.42(2)(o)1.g. or 3., or identified by State
63 Board of Education rule;
64 (III) Is not suited to student needs and their ability to
65 comprehend the material presented; or
66 (IV) Is inappropriate for the grade level and age group
67 for which the material is used.
68
69 A resident of the county who is not the parent or guardian of a
70 student with access to school district materials may not object
71 to more than one material per month. The State Board of
72 Education may adopt rules to implement this provision. Any
73 material that is subject to an objection on the basis of sub-
74 sub-subparagraph b.(I) or sub-sub-subparagraph b.(II) must be
75 removed within 5 school days after receipt of the objection and
Page 3 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6031-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6031 2026
76 remain unavailable to students of that school until the
77 objection is resolved. Parents shall have the right to read
78 passages from any material that is subject to an objection. If
79 the school board denies a parent the right to read passages due
80 to content that meets the requirements under sub-sub-
81 subparagraph b.(I), the school district shall discontinue the
82 use of the material in the school district. If the district
83 school board finds that any material meets the requirements
84 under sub-subparagraph a. or that any other material contains
85 prohibited content under sub-sub-subparagraph b.(I), the school
86 district shall discontinue use of the material. If the district
87 school board finds that any other material contains prohibited
88 content under sub-sub-subparagraphs b.(II)-(IV), the school
89 district shall discontinue use of the material for any grade
90 level or age group for which such use is inappropriate or
91 unsuitable.
92 2.3. Each district school board must establish a process
93 by which the parent of a public school student or a resident of
94 the county may contest the district school board's adoption of a
95 specific instructional material. The parent or resident must
96 file a petition, on a form provided by the school board, within
97 30 calendar days after the adoption of the instructional
98 material by the school board. The school board must make the
99 form available to the public and publish the form on the school
100 district's website. The form must be signed by the parent or
Page 4 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6031-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6031 2026
101 resident, include the required contact information, and state
102 the objection to the instructional material based on the
103 criteria of s. 1006.31(2) or s. 1006.40(3)(c). Within 30 days
104 after the 30-day period has expired, the school board must, for
105 all petitions timely received, conduct at least one open public
106 hearing before an unbiased and qualified hearing officer. The
107 hearing officer may not be an employee or agent of the school
108 district. The hearing is not subject to the provisions of
109 chapter 120; however, the hearing must provide sufficient
110 procedural protections to allow each petitioner an adequate and
111 fair opportunity to be heard and present evidence to the hearing
112 officer. The school board's decision after convening a hearing
113 is final and not subject to further petition or review.
114 3.4. Meetings of committees convened for the purpose of
115 ranking, eliminating, or selecting instructional materials for
116 recommendation to the district school board must be noticed and
117 open to the public in accordance with s. 286.011. Any committees
118 convened for such purposes must include parents of students who
119 will have access to such materials.
120 5. Meetings of committees convened for the purpose of
121 resolving an objection by a parent or resident to specific
122 materials must be noticed and open to the public in accordance
123 with s. 286.011. Any committees convened for such purposes must
124 include parents of students who will have access to such
125 materials.
Page 5 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6031-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6031 2026
126 6. If a parent disagrees with the determination made by
127 the district school board on the objection to the use of a
128 specific material, a parent may request the Commissioner of
129 Education to appoint a special magistrate who is a member of The
130 Florida Bar in good standing and who has at least 5 years'
131 experience in administrative law. The special magistrate shall
132 determine facts relating to the school district's determination,
133 consider information provided by the parent and the school
134 district, and render a recommended decision for resolution to
135 the State Board of Education within 30 days after receipt of the
136 request by the parent. The State Board of Education must approve
137 or reject the recommended decision at its next regularly
138 scheduled meeting that is more than 7 calendar days and no more
139 than 30 days after the date the recommended decision is
140 transmitted. The costs of the special magistrate shall be borne
141 by the school district. The State Board of Education shall adopt
142 rules, including forms, necessary to implement this
143 subparagraph.
144 (d) School library media services; establishment and
145 maintenance.—Establish and maintain a program of school library
146 media services for all public schools in the district, including
147 school library media centers, or school library media centers
148 open to the public, and, in addition such traveling or
149 circulating libraries as may be needed for the proper operation
150 of the district school system. School librarians, media
Page 6 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6031-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6031 2026
151 specialists, and other personnel involved in the selection of
152 school district library materials must complete the training
153 program developed pursuant to s. 1006.29(6) before reviewing and
154 selecting age-appropriate materials and library resources. Upon
155 written request, a school district shall provide access to any
156 material or book specified in the request that is maintained in
157 a district school system library and is available for review.
158 1. Each book made available to students through a school
159 district library media center or included in a recommended or
160 assigned school or grade-level reading list must be selected by
161 a school district employee who holds a valid educational media
162 specialist certificate, regardless of whether the book is
163 purchased, donated, or otherwise made available to students.
164 2. Each district school board shall adopt procedures for
165 developing library media center collections and post the
166 procedures on the website for each school within the district.
167 The procedures must:
168 a. Require that book selections meet the criteria in s.
169 1006.40(3)(c).
170 b. Require consultation of reputable, professionally
171 recognized reviewing periodicals and school community
172 stakeholders.
173 c. Provide for library media center collections, including
174 classroom libraries, based on reader interest, support of state
175 academic standards and aligned curriculum, and the academic
Page 7 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6031-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6031 2026
176 needs of students and faculty.
177 d. Provide for the regular removal or discontinuance of
178 books based on, at a minimum, physical condition, rate of recent
179 circulation, alignment to state academic standards and relevancy
180 to curriculum, and out-of-date content, and required removal
181 pursuant to subparagraph (a)2.
182 3. Each elementary school must publish on its website, in
183 a searchable format prescribed by the department, a list of all
184 materials maintained and accessible in the school library media
185 center or a classroom library or required as part of a school or
186 grade-level reading list.
187 4. Each district school board shall adopt and publish on
188 its website the process for a parent to limit his or her
189 student's access to materials in the school or classroom
190 library.
191 (e) Public participation.—Publish on its website, in a
192 searchable format prescribed by the department, a list of all
193 instructional materials, including those used to provide
194 instruction required by s. 1003.42. Each district school board
195 must:
196 1. Provide access to all materials, excluding teacher
197 editions, in accordance with s. 1006.283(2)(b)8.a. before the
198 district school board takes any official action on such
199 materials. This process must include reasonable safeguards
200 against the unauthorized use, reproduction, and distribution of
Page 8 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6031-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6031 2026
201 instructional materials considered for adoption.
202 2. Select, approve, adopt, or purchase all materials as a
203 separate line item on the agenda and provide a reasonable
204 opportunity for public comment. The use of materials described
205 in this paragraph may not be selected, approved, or adopted as
206 part of a consent agenda.
207 3. Annually, on June 30, submit to the Commissioner of
208 Education a report that identifies:
209 a. Each material for which the school district received an
210 objection pursuant to subparagraph (a)2., including the grade
211 level and course the material was used in, for the school year
212 and the specific objections thereto.
213 b. Each material that was removed or discontinued.
214 c. Each material that was not removed or discontinued and
215 the rationale for not removing or discontinuing the material.
216
217 The department shall publish and regularly update a list of
218 materials that were removed or discontinued, sorted by grade
219 level, as a result of an objection and disseminate the list to
220 school districts for consideration in their selection
221 procedures.
222 Section 2. Paragraphs (d) through (f) of subsection (1) of
223 section 1014.05, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as paragraphs
224 (c) through (e), and present paragraphs (c) and (f) of that
225 subsection are amended to read:
Page 9 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6031-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6031 2026
226 1014.05 School district notifications on parental rights.—
227 (1) Each district school board shall, in consultation with
228 parents, teachers, and administrators, develop and adopt a
229 policy to promote parental involvement in the public school
230 system. Such policy must include:
231 (c) Procedures, pursuant to s. 1006.28(2)(a)2., for a
232 parent to object to instructional materials and other materials
233 used in the classroom. Such objections may be based on beliefs
234 regarding morality, sex, and religion or the belief that such
235 materials are harmful. For purposes of this section, the term
236 "instructional materials" has the same meaning as in s.
237 1006.29(2) and may include other materials used in the
238 classroom, including workbooks and worksheets, handouts,
239 software, applications, and any digital media made available to
240 students.
241 (e)(f) Procedures for a parent to learn about parental
242 rights and responsibilities under general law, including all of
243 the following:
244 1. Pursuant to s. 1002.20(3)(d), the right to opt his or
245 her minor child out of any portion of the school district's
246 comprehensive health education required under s. 1003.42(2)(o)
247 that relates to sex education instruction in acquired immune
248 deficiency syndrome education or any instruction regarding
249 sexuality.
250 2. A plan to disseminate information, pursuant to s.
Page 10 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6031-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6031 2026
251 1002.20(6), about school choice options, including open
252 enrollment.
253 3. In accordance with s. 1002.20(3)(b), the right of a
254 parent to exempt his or her minor child from immunizations.
255 4. In accordance with s. 1008.22, the right of a parent to
256 review statewide, standardized assessment results.
257 5. In accordance with s. 1003.57, the right of a parent to
258 enroll his or her minor child in gifted or special education
259 programs.
260 6. In accordance with s. 1006.28(2)(a)1., the right of a
261 parent to inspect school district instructional materials.
262 6.7. In accordance with s. 1008.25, the right of a parent
263 to access information relating to the school district's policies
264 for promotion or retention, including high school graduation
265 requirements.
266 7.8. In accordance with s. 1002.20(14), the right of a
267 parent to receive a school report card and be informed of his or
268 her minor child's attendance requirements.
269 8.9. In accordance with s. 1002.23, the right of a parent
270 to access information relating to the state public education
271 system, state standards, report card requirements, attendance
272 requirements, and instructional materials requirements.
273 9.10. In accordance with s. 1002.23(4), the right of a
274 parent to participate in parent-teacher associations and
275 organizations that are sanctioned by a district school board or
Page 11 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6031-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6031 2026
276 the Department of Education.
277 10.11. In accordance with s. 1002.222(1)(a), the right of
278 a parent to opt out of any district-level data collection
279 relating to his or her minor child not required by law.
280 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 12 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6031-00